Hawaii, session 2025, HB206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart B, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A- Hawaiian language; high school graduation requirement.  Each public high school in the State shall require students to complete and pass two full years of Hawaiian language courses as a condition of graduation, beginning with the graduating class of       ." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________